Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB16.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 205 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "certified professional midwifery services" and "licensed
certified professional midwife" have the same meaning as in KRS 314.400.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Department for
Medicaid Services and any managed care organization with whom the
department contracts for the delivery of Medicaid services shall provide coverage
for certified professional midwifery services that are provided by a licensed
certified professional midwife.
(3) Coverage required by this section shall not be subject to:
(a) Cost-sharing requirements; or
(b) Utilization management requirements, including prior authorization.
(4) The Department for Medicaid Services may promulgate any administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A necessary to implement the
provisions of this section.
Section 2. If the Department for Medicaid Services or the Cabinet for Health
and Family Services determines that a state plan amendment, waiver, or any other form
of authorization or approval from any federal agency is necessary prior to implementation
of Section 1 of this Act for any reason, including the loss of federal funds, the department
or cabinet shall, within 90 days after the effective date of this Act, request any necessary
state plan amendment, waiver, authorization, or approval, and may only delay full
implementation of those provisions for which a state plan amendment, waiver,
authorization, or approval was deemed necessary until the state plan amendment, waiver,
authorization, or approval is granted or approved.
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/3/2025 2:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1075
Section 3. The Department for Medicaid Services or the Cabinet for Health and
Family Services shall, in accordance with KRS 205.525, provide a copy of any state plan
amendment, waiver application, or other request for authorization or approval submitted
pursuant to Section 2 of this Act to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to
the Interim Joint Committee on Health Services and the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue and shall provide an update on the status of any application
or request submitted pursuant to Section 2 of this Act at the request of the Legislative
Research Commission or any committee thereof.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/3/2025 2:38 PM Jacketed